Utah statutes.
9-6-607.   Office director.

(1)  The executive director of the department, after consultation with the board, shall appoint the director of the office.

(2)  The director shall have a graduate degree in museum studies or a related field or comparable nonformal training and preferably a minimum of five years continuous paid work service in a museum.

